Tennessee, session 114, SB1560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (66).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-251(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee sports hall of fame, created by § 4-3-5403;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1560
010118
- 1 -